Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-12,238
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,238 to 81-12,243 shall be known and may be cited as the Economic Recovery Act.

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 46;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 194.